Idaho, session 2025, H0428.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 1, Title 33, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 33-143, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
33-143. PUBLIC BROADCASTING RIGHTS FOR IDAHO HIGH SCHOOL SPORTS
EVENTS. (1) As used in this section:
(a) "High school sports events" means all athletic competitions sanc-
tioned by the Idaho high school activities association (IHSAA) for pub-
lic and private high schools in Idaho.
(b) "Idaho public television" means the public broadcasting service
operated by the state board of education.
(2) Idaho public television shall have the right of first refusal to
broadcast all high school sports events. Such priority includes rights for
live broadcast, delayed broadcast, or any form of broadcast, whether through
television, radio, or online streaming, subject to the following condi-
tions:
(a) Idaho public television shall notify the IHSAA of its intent to
broadcast any high school sports event at least thirty (30) days prior
to the date of such event, and the IHSAA shall notify the participating
schools; and
(b) If Idaho public television declines to broadcast the high school
sports event or does not give proper notice pursuant to paragraph (a) of
this subsection, other broadcasters may apply for broadcasting rights
of such high school sports event under conditions set by the IHSAA.
(3) Any revenue generated by the broadcasting of high school sports
events by Idaho public television pursuant to this section shall be used
to support educational programming and public broadcasting initiatives in
Idaho. A portion of such revenue, as determined by the state board of edu-
cation, shall be allocated to the public high schools or the IHSAA for the
improvement of sports facilities and sports programs.
(4) The broadcasting of high school sports events by Idaho public tele-
vision pursuant to this section shall comply with all applicable federal and
state laws, including laws relating to privacy, copyright, and antitrust.
(5) The state board of education, in consultation with the IHSAA, may
promulgate rules, subject to legislative approval, to implement this sec-
tion effectively, including but not limited to the scheduling of broadcasts,
content guidelines, and technical standards.


SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.